Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-245
Cemeteries; ordinances governing; enforcement.

A city of the first class may pass rules and ordinances imposing penalties and fines not exceeding one hundred dollars, regulating, protecting and governing the cemetery, the owners of lots therein, visitors thereof, and trespassers therein. The officers of such city shall have as full jurisdiction and power in the enforcing of such rules and ordinances as though they related to the city itself.

Laws 1901, c. 18, § 48, LI, p. 258;

R.S.1913, § 4861;

C.S.1922, § 4029;

C.S.1929, § 16-246;

R.S.1943, § 16-245.